Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 734 N 1
SFX 734 0 dedo .

SFX 735 N 1
SFX 735 0 den .

SFX 736 N 1
SFX 736 0 der .

SFX 737 N 1
SFX 737 0 derbijlpark .

SFX 738 N 1
SFX 738 0 derburgh .

SFX 739 N 1
SFX 739 0 dgir .

SFX 740 N 1
SFX 740 0 dgorica .

SFX 741 N 1
SFX 741 0 dhidham .

SFX 742 N 1
SFX 742 0 dhinagar .

SFX 743 N 1
SFX 743 0 dhpur .

SFX 744 N 1
SFX 744 0 di .

SFX 745 N 1
SFX 745 0 die .

SFX 746 N 1
SFX 746 0 digul .

SFX 747 N 1
SFX 747 0 ding .

SFX 748 N 1
SFX 748 0 dingen .

SFX 749 N 1
SFX 749 0 diqabad .

SFX 750 N 1
SFX 750 0 dira .

SFX 751 N 1
SFX 751 0 dkin .

SFX 752 N 1
SFX 752 0 dlachie .

SFX 753 N 1
SFX 753 0 dli .

SFX 754 N 1
SFX 754 0 do .

SFX 755 N 1
SFX 755 0 dod .

SFX 756 N 1
SFX 756 0 dodara .

SFX 757 N 1
SFX 757 0 dolsk .

SFX 758 N 1
SFX 758 0 don .

SFX 759 N 1
SFX 759 0 dong .

SFX 760 N 1
SFX 760 0 doret .

SFX 761 N 1
SFX 761 0 douf .

SFX 762 N 1
SFX 762 0 dôz .

SFX 763 N 1
SFX 763 0 dra .

SFX 764 N 1
SFX 764 0 drain .

SFX 765 N 1
SFX 765 0 dravina .

SFX 766 N 1
SFX 766 0 du .

SFX 767 N 1
SFX 767 0 dubon .

SFX 768 N 1
SFX 768 0 dum .

SFX 769 N 1
SFX 769 0 dupar .

SFX 770 N 1
SFX 770 0 dupi .

SFX 771 N 1
SFX 771 0 duz .

SFX 772 N 1
SFX 772 0 dwa .

SFX 773 N 1
SFX 773 0 dy .

SFX 774 N 1
SFX 774 0 dza .

SFX 775 N 1
SFX 775 0 e .

SFX 776 N 1
SFX 776 0 é .

SFX 777 N 1
SFX 777 0 earns .

SFX 778 N 1
SFX 778 0 east .

SFX 779 N 1
SFX 779 0 ebago .

SFX 780 N 1
SFX 780 0 ed .

SFX 781 N 1
SFX 781 0 eda .

SFX 782 N 1
SFX 782 0 eds .

SFX 783 N 1
SFX 783 0 edweyne .

SFX 784 N 1
SFX 784 0 eel .

SFX 785 N 1
SFX 785 0 eele .

SFX 786 N 1
SFX 786 0 egiardino .

SFX 787 N 1
SFX 787 0 egu .

SFX 788 N 1
SFX 788 0 eim .

SFX 789 N 1
SFX 789 0 ein .

SFX 790 N 1
SFX 790 0 eïn .

SFX 791 N 1
SFX 791 0 einburg .

SFX 792 N 1
SFX 792 0 einfurt .

SFX 793 N 1
SFX 793 0 eiro .

SFX 794 N 1
SFX 794 0 ejeon .

SFX 795 N 1
SFX 795 0 ek .

SFX 796 N 1
SFX 796 0 ektrostal .

SFX 797 N 1
SFX 797 0 el .

SFX 798 N 1
SFX 798 0 elanau .

SFX 799 N 1
SFX 799 0 eles .

SFX 800 N 1
SFX 800 0 elsa .

SFX 801 N 1
SFX 801 0 elzen .

SFX 802 N 1
SFX 802 0 ém .

SFX 803 N 1
SFX 803 0 eman .

SFX 804 N 1
SFX 804 0 emarle .

SFX 805 N 1
SFX 805 0 en .

SFX 806 N 1
SFX 806 0 én .

SFX 807 N 1
SFX 807 0 ên .

SFX 808 N 1
SFX 808 0 ena .

SFX 809 N 1
SFX 809 0 ence .

SFX 810 N 1
SFX 810 0 end .

SFX 811 N 1
SFX 811 0 enda .

SFX 812 N 1
SFX 812 0 endal .

SFX 813 N 1
SFX 813 0 endranagar .

SFX 814 N 1
SFX 814 0 énégro .

SFX 815 N 1
SFX 815 0 eng .

SFX 816 N 1
SFX 816 0 éni .

SFX 817 N 1
SFX 817 0 enlabrada .

SFX 818 N 1
SFX 818 0 enne .

SFX 819 N 1
SFX 819 0 enyurt .

SFX 820 N 1
SFX 820 0 enza .

SFX 821 N 1
SFX 821 0 eo .

SFX 822 N 1
SFX 822 0 epanakert .

SFX 823 N 1
SFX 823 0 eph .

SFX 824 N 1
SFX 824 0 ephens .

SFX 825 N 1
SFX 825 0 ephenson .

SFX 826 N 1
SFX 826 0 ephine .

SFX 827 N 1
SFX 827 0 er .

SFX 828 N 1
SFX 828 0 erbaïdjan .

SFX 829 N 1
SFX 829 0 erborough .

SFX 830 N 1
SFX 830 0 erdon .

SFX 831 N 1
SFX 831 0 erec .

SFX 832 N 1
SFX 832 0 erey .

SFX 833 N 1
SFX 833 0 erham .

SFX 834 N 1
SFX 834 0 eri .

SFX 835 N 1
SFX 835 0 eria .

SFX 836 N 1
SFX 836 0 ería .

SFX 837 N 1
SFX 837 0 erling .

SFX 838 N 1
SFX 838 0 erlitamak .

SFX 839 N 1
SFX 839 0 ern .

SFX 840 N 1
SFX 840 0 eron .

SFX 841 N 1
SFX 841 0 eroun .

SFX 842 N 1
SFX 842 0 errey .

SFX 843 N 1
SFX 843 0 erson .

SFX 844 N 1
SFX 844 0 erston .

SFX 845 N 1
SFX 845 0 erta .

SFX 846 N 1
SFX 846 0 ertad .

SFX 847 N 1
SFX 847 0 ertador .

SFX 848 N 1
SFX 848 0 erton .

SFX 849 N 1
SFX 849 0 erty .

SFX 850 N 1
SFX 850 0 erwald .

SFX 851 N 1
SFX 851 0 es .

SFX 852 N 1
SFX 852 0 esanuova .

SFX 853 N 1
SFX 853 0 eshiek .

SFX 854 N 1
SFX 854 0 eshou .

SFX 855 N 1
SFX 855 0 et .

SFX 856 N 1
SFX 856 0 etano .

SFX 857 N 1
SFX 857 0 etto .

SFX 858 N 1
SFX 858 0 euben .

SFX 859 N 1
SFX 859 0 euthera .

SFX 860 N 1
SFX 860 0 evens .

SFX 861 N 1
SFX 861 0 evideo .

SFX 862 N 1
SFX 862 0 ewah .

SFX 863 N 1
SFX 863 0 ewal .

SFX 864 N 1
SFX 864 0 ewart .

SFX 865 N 1
SFX 865 0 exiu .

SFX 866 N 1
SFX 866 0 ey .

SFX 867 N 1
SFX 867 0 eya .

SFX 868 N 1
SFX 868 0 eyang .

SFX 869 N 1
SFX 869 0 ezuma .

SFX 870 N 1
SFX 870 0 f .

SFX 871 N 1
SFX 871 0 fast .

SFX 872 N 1
SFX 872 0 fen .

SFX 873 N 1
SFX 873 0 feng .

SFX 874 N 1
SFX 874 0 fi .

SFX 875 N 1
SFX 875 0 fiance .

SFX 876 N 1
SFX 876 0 field .

SFX 877 N 1
SFX 877 0 firðir .

SFX 878 N 1
SFX 878 0 fisher .

SFX 879 N 1
SFX 879 0 fla .

SFX 880 N 1
SFX 880 0 flore .

SFX 881 N 1
SFX 881 0 fold .

SFX 882 N 1
SFX 882 0 ford .

SFX 883 N 1
SFX 883 0 fornie .

SFX 884 N 1
SFX 884 0 fort .

SFX 885 N 1
SFX 885 0 four .

SFX 886 N 1
SFX 886 0 fu .

SFX 887 N 1
SFX 887 0 g .

SFX 888 N 1
SFX 888 0 ga .

SFX 889 N 1
SFX 889 0 gabat .

SFX 890 N 1
SFX 890 0 gadahoc .

SFX 891 N 1
SFX 891 0 gado .

SFX 892 N 1
SFX 892 0 gaing .

SFX 893 N 1
SFX 893 0 gainville .

SFX 894 N 1
SFX 894 0 gale .

SFX 895 N 1
SFX 895 0 gamihara .

SFX 896 N 1
SFX 896 0 gamu .

SFX 897 N 1
SFX 897 0 gana .

SFX 898 N 1
SFX 898 0 ganagar .

SFX 899 N 1
SFX 899 0 ganda .

SFX 900 N 1
SFX 900 0 ganem .

SFX 901 N 1
SFX 901 0 ganés .

SFX 902 N 1
SFX 902 0 gang .

SFX 903 N 1
SFX 903 0 ganj .

SFX 904 N 1
SFX 904 0 ganui .

SFX 905 N 1
SFX 905 0 gapour .

SFX 906 N 1
SFX 906 0 gar .

SFX 907 N 1
SFX 907 0 garaja .

SFX 908 N 1
SFX 908 0 garh .

SFX 909 N 1
SFX 909 0 gârh .

SFX 910 N 1
SFX 910 0 gasaki .

SFX 911 N 1
SFX 911 0 gaum .

SFX 912 N 1
SFX 912 0 gawa .

SFX 913 N 1
SFX 913 0 gazê .

SFX 914 N 1
SFX 914 0 gazpi .

SFX 915 N 1
SFX 915 0 gbao .

SFX 916 N 1
SFX 916 0 gbu .

SFX 917 N 1
SFX 917 0 gburi .

SFX 918 N 1
SFX 918 0 gda .

SFX 919 N 1
SFX 919 0 gdue .

SFX 920 N 1
SFX 920 0 ge .

SFX 921 N 1
SFX 921 0 gea .

SFX 922 N 1
SFX 922 0 geburg .

SFX 923 N 1
SFX 923 0 gels .

SFX 924 N 1
SFX 924 0 gent .

SFX 925 N 1
SFX 925 0 gep .

SFX 926 N 1
SFX 926 0 ger .

SFX 927 N 1
SFX 927 0 gersdorp .

SFX 928 N 1
SFX 928 0 ggendorf .

SFX 929 N 1
SFX 929 0 ggett .

SFX 930 N 1
SFX 930 0 ggi .

SFX 931 N 1
SFX 931 0 gha .

SFX 932 N 1
SFX 932 0 ghai .

SFX 933 N 1
SFX 933 0 ghazi .

SFX 934 N 1
SFX 934 0 ghestan .

SFX 935 N 1
SFX 935 0 ghold .

SFX 936 N 1
SFX 936 0 gin .

SFX 937 N 1
SFX 937 0 ginaw .

SFX 938 N 1
SFX 938 0 gique .

SFX 939 N 1
SFX 939 0 gkhla .

SFX 940 N 1
SFX 940 0 gkhram .

SFX 941 N 1
SFX 941 0 gkulu .

SFX 942 N 1
SFX 942 0 glaize .

SFX 943 N 1
SFX 943 0 gli .

SFX 944 N 1
SFX 944 0 glish .

SFX 945 N 1
SFX 945 0 gne .

SFX 946 N 1
SFX 946 0 gneung .

SFX 947 N 1
SFX 947 0 gnica .

SFX 948 N 1
SFX 948 0 go .

SFX 949 N 1
SFX 949 0 godha .

SFX 950 N 1
SFX 950 0 gola .

SFX 951 N 1
SFX 951 0 golfing .

SFX 952 N 1
SFX 952 0 gomery .

SFX 953 N 1
SFX 953 0 gordany .

SFX 954 N 1
SFX 954 0 gorod .

SFX 955 N 1
SFX 955 0 gouriba .

SFX 956 N 1
SFX 956 0 gracia .

SFX 957 N 1
SFX 957 0 grade .

SFX 958 N 1
SFX 958 0 grim .

SFX 959 N 1
SFX 959 0 gro .

SFX 960 N 1
SFX 960 0 gsbourg .

SFX 961 N 1
SFX 961 0 gsworth .

SFX 962 N 1
SFX 962 0 guache .

SFX 963 N 1
SFX 963 0 guela .

SFX 964 N 1
SFX 964 0 gui .

SFX 965 N 1
SFX 965 0 guo .

SFX 966 N 1
SFX 966 0 gure .

SFX 967 N 1
SFX 967 0 gusta .

SFX 968 N 1
SFX 968 0 gustine .

SFX 969 N 1
SFX 969 0 gwon .

SFX 970 N 1
SFX 970 0 gwu .

SFX 971 N 1
SFX 971 0 gxi .

SFX 972 N 1
SFX 972 0 gyuan .

SFX 973 N 1
SFX 973 0 gzhou .

SFX 974 N 1
SFX 974 0 gzi .

SFX 975 N 1
SFX 975 0 h .

SFX 976 N 1
SFX 976 0 ha .

SFX 977 N 1
SFX 977 0 hai .

SFX 978 N 1
SFX 978 0 ham .

SFX 979 N 1
SFX 979 0 han .

SFX 980 N 1
SFX 980 0 hang .

SFX 981 N 1
SFX 981 0 hâr .

SFX 982 N 1
SFX 982 0 hara .

SFX 983 N 1
SFX 983 0 haranpur .

SFX 984 N 1
SFX 984 0 hares .

SFX 985 N 1
SFX 985 0 harsa .

SFX 986 N 1
SFX 986 0 hausen .

SFX 987 N 1
SFX 987 0 haven .

SFX 988 N 1
SFX 988 0 he .

SFX 989 N 1
SFX 989 0 head .

SFX 990 N 1
SFX 990 0 heim .

SFX 991 N 1
SFX 991 0 hermosa .

SFX 992 N 1
SFX 992 0 hezi .

SFX 993 N 1
SFX 993 0 hi .

SFX 994 N 1
SFX 994 0 high .
