Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.dic
Alta/956,1018,1799
Antioch/775
Baru/834,1681
Beau/884,1300,1551
Beaver/989
Bent/990,1433,1450
Bois/775
Bremer/987
Cali/883
Cap/775,1030,1092
Carter/855
Cass/797,1019
Cay/818,866,1433,1450,1731
Chas/775
Chester/876
Chey/818
Clair/775
Clark/775,1678
Clear/876,1780
Collin/851,961,1599
Cook/775
Coro/945,1314,1388,1817
Craig/989
Crook/780
Cross/775
Cruz/851
Day/775,1710
Ed/773,775
Emmen/748
Gem/808
Gharb/867,1016
Gold/805
Guang/759,979,1634,1794,1815
Gyeongsan/887
Haïti/805
Harar/775
Hardin/887
Hart/882,1212
Haut/775,851
Hawk/775,1068
Hong/902,1010,1122,1567
Hunt/830,1061,1064,1678
Ise/982,1602,1809
Jan/750,793
Jeff/843
Jos/775,776,823,826
Khan/772,863
King/878,1259,1599,1615,1669
Kon/762,887,1692,1800
Kru/927,1626,1671
Les/979,1217,1472
Livingston/775
Long/873,882,977,1122,1127,1168,1322,1730,1802
Mila/959,1252,1313
Misrata/975
Mosta/900,1530
Mun/754,926,1033
Nord/986,1192
Norman/745
Oran/920,922
Oum/775,1252
Park/775,827
Paul/747,1091,1433
Pend/776,827,1113,1210
Phan/887,1448
Pool/775
Quba/753
Ray/775,1458,1802
Roth/833
Somali/775
spécial/775
Spring/876,1599
Tin/761,930
Town/827,1599,1678
Tuy/807
Valle/769
Vest/877,881
Villa/991,1197,1766
Wad/775,808,839,1016
Walk/827
Wan/904,919,1031
Winn/779,853,1077
Yona/948
